Hawaii statutes.
[§363-12]
Disbursement of World War II Filipino-American veterans burial grant funds. (a)
The office of veterans' services, at the request of a deceased World War II
Filipino-American veteran's survivor or an interested party, shall make
payment, under the veterans burial grant program, directly to a licensed
provider of mortuary or crematory services in the State for the cost of:

(1) Providing
funeral and burial services for a deceased World War II Filipino-American
veteran; and

(2) Transporting
the remains of a deceased World War II Filipino-American veteran to the
Philippines.

(b) The
maximum amount that may be disbursed on behalf of a deceased World War II
Filipino-American veteran under this section is $2,500.

(c) The
office of veterans' services shall not expend more than the amount appropriated
for the fiscal year to provide burial grants for deceased World War II
Filipino-American veterans.

(d) The
office of veterans' services shall establish specific eligibility criteria,
application and appeal procedures, service choices, and invoicing
arrangements. Eligibility shall include the requirement that a World War II
Filipino-American veteran was, at the time of death, a resident of the State,
as evidenced by valid documentation of state residence, a State of Hawaii
driver's license, or a State of Hawaii identification card.

(e)
Payment shall be made by the office of veterans' services upon the submission
of a contract for services on behalf of the deceased World War II
Filipino-American veteran and an itemized unpaid invoice to the office.

(f) For
the purposes of this section, "World War II Filipino-American
veteran" means any Filipino-American veteran, who is now a citizen of the
United States, who served honorably in an active duty status in any of the
armed services of the United States between September 1, 1939, and December 31,
1946. [L 2003, c 101, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next